








































BANKEX Proof-of-Asset Protocol

The Smart White Paper, version 0.3.1 beta

October 19, 2017

Abstract

BANKEX Proof-of-Asset protocol (PoA) is a standard that enables new generation of assets and contracts
called Decentralized capital markets. We are building Internet of Assets (IoA) on the principles of Bank-as-
a-Service (BaaS), powered by Internet of Things (IoT ) and Artificial Intelligence (AI ) technologies. PoA
protocol is open for 3rd party fintech providers, AI and IOT labs, traditional financial institutions and asset
owners.

Contents

1 Introduction 2
1.1 Disclaimer . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
1.2 BANKEX Proof-of-Asset Protocol . . 2
1.3 Specification of Examples in White

Paper . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
1.4 Game Theory Behind the Proof-of-

Asset Protocol . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3

2 Modern Financial Markets 3
2.1 Bank-as-a-Service (BaaS ) Business

Model . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
2.2 Decentralized BaaS Model . . . . . . . 4
2.3 Classical Microservice Architecture . . 5
2.4 Blockchain Serviсe Architecture . . . . 5
2.5 Complexity regulation of the

Blockchain Service Architecture . . . . 7
2.6 Benefits of the Blockchain Service Ar-

chitecture . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
2.7 Liquidity Theory in the Context of To-

kenization . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
2.8 Mathematical Market Making Models

for Smart Asset . . . . . . . . . . . . . 9

3 Target assets for tokenization 10
3.1 Types of Assets and Asset Requirements 10
3.2 Choosing a Role in New Economy:

Coin or Smart Asset . . . . . . . . . . 10
3.3 Requirements and Options for Asset

Tokenization . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
3.4 Example: Tokenizing Shares in Non-

Public Companies . . . . . . . . . . . 13

3.5 Fundamental Advantage of Tokeniza-
tion for an Asset . . . . . . . . . . . . 13

4 Originator, Product Owner and Sup-
plier 14
4.1 Schematic of the Proof-of-Asset Protocol 14
4.2 Originator . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
4.3 Product Owner: Vision . . . . . . . . 15
4.4 Product Owner: Certification . . . . . 16
4.5 Product Owner: Basic Information . . 17
4.6 Product Owner: Smart Asset Catalog 17
4.7 Supplier . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 19

5 Initial Smart Asset Offering (ISAO) 19
5.1 BANKEX Foundation . . . . . . . . . 19
5.2 BANKEX Crypto-FIAT Depository . 21
5.3 BANKEX Crypto Fund . . . . . . . . 22
5.4 Initial Smart Asset Offering (ISAO) . 22
5.5 Open Source: Smart Asset Core . . . . 22

6 BANKEX Proof-of-Asset Protocol 23
6.1 Registration data & product data . . . 23
6.2 Creating a Smart Asset . . . . . . . . 23
6.3 Smart Asset Сaterpillar . . . . . . . . 24
6.4 Initial contract . . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
6.5 Validation . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 27
6.6 Audit & Legal . . . . . . . . . . . . . 28
6.7 Proposal . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 28

7 Technical solutions 29
7.1 IT Architecture Scheme . . . . . . . . 29
7.2 Asset data compression for blockchain

record . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
7.3 Role and system access matrix . . . . 29

1



7.4 Originator/Supplier interaction in the
ecosystem architecture . . . . . . . . . 29

7.5 Bank & non-Bank Originator/Supplier 29
7.6 Use of Microsoft Azure Bank API . . . 29
7.7 Large data volume hashing in the Mi-

crosoft Azure Storage . . . . . . . . . 29
7.8 Soft and Hard Commitment assign-

ment rules . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
7.9 Bid & Ask records independence prin-

ciple . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
7.10 Decentralized Order Book rules . . . . 29
7.11 Decentralized matching — pros and cons 29
7.12 Offchain Settelment Control . . . . . . 29
7.13 Settelment directions . . . . . . . . . . 29
7.14 Formula 1: saturation of request with

data in a blockchain environment . . . 29
7.15 Reasons for differentiation between or-

der and bid for Smart Assets . . . . . 29
7.16 Formula 2: solution for automated or-

der merging and separation . . . . . . 29
7.17 Formula 3: filter cascade system in the

Order Book . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
7.18 Formula 4: implementation of clas-

sical stock market trade rules in a
blockchain environment . . . . . . . . 29

7.19 Study of speed parameters of matching
for Smart Assets . . . . . . . . . . . . 29

7.20 Technological differences during Sup-
plier tokenization . . . . . . . . . . . . 29

7.21 Transaction execution with decentral-
ized storage . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 31

7.22 Work with order packages during con-
tract initiation . . . . . . . . . . . . . 31

7.23 Order of Escrow function in the trans-
action execution block . . . . . . . . . 31

7.24 Smart Asset Core v.3 . . . . . . . . . . 31
7.25 Smart Asset Core v.4 . . . . . . . . . . 31
7.26 “Plasma” protocol & Proof-of-Asset

Protocol . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 31
7.27 The most important features of

Plasma protocol . . . . . . . . . . . . 31
7.28 IoT Integration Scheme . . . . . . . . 33

A Terminology 35

1 Introduction

1.1 Disclaimer

You are reading The Smart White Paper.
It was developed by the BANKEX team and de-

scribes a decentralized technology for control of liq-
uidity of smart assets based on the Proof-of-Asset
Protocol.

We provide the description of the technology,
based on our level of knowledge and development.
We hope you will find it valuable. However, there
are certain commitments we are unable to make in
regards to the technology of the protocol. Neither
BANKEX, nor its suppliers and distributors provide
any guarantees regarding the Proof-of-Asset Protocol
software, aside from those mentioned in the provided
and additional Terms of Use. We take no responsi-
bility in regards to the contents of the protocol soft-
ware, its special functional capabilities, availability
and compliance with your requirements. All services
are provided “as is”.

Local law of certain countries ensures guarantees
such as vendibility, serviceability in certain fields, in-
vestor protection and intellectual property rights pro-
tection. Aside from situations outlined in the legal
system, we exclude any and all implied warranties.

After reading The Smart White Paper you may
decide to take part in the development of new decen-
tralized technologies, using your knowledge, time and
financial resources. Therefore by reading this text,
you assume the unconditional obligation that, in the
event of being a citizen of USA, China, Singapore,
Russia or any other country, any lawsuit with any
claimant, where your name is featured as an involved
party, we receive a guaranteed right to charge you as
a private party for the full amount of losses, including
any fines or legal costs, including in the event of your
using software (VPN, Class Action, etc) to conceal
your true country of residence.

1.2 BANKEX Proof-of-Asset Proto-
col

BANKEX is an organization that unites members of
the financial markets in order to build a community
and implement the Proof-of-Asset Protocol enables
community members to profit from mutual use of as-
sets.

The product of BANKEX is the Proof-of-Asset
Protocol, which solves the issue of non-fungible asset
liquidity. Proof-of-Asset means the token released as
part of the protocol is ensured with an asset. The
know-how of BANKEX is the Proof-of-Asset pro-
tocol, in essence a combination of BaaS (Bank-as-
a-Service) and blockchain technologies. We take a
client asset, primarily on the financial market, we to-
kenize it, then, without waiting for the portfolio to ac-
cumulate critical mass, we turn this asset into money
for the bank. This is made possible through forma-
tion of a single pool of similar assets (e.g., pool of
banks) thereby creating a marketplace, where banks
benefit from liquidity and investors benefit from a
predictable and transparent cash flow.

2



1.3 Specification of Examples in
White Paper

All examples and demonstrations in this White Pa-
per are used only as demonstrative examples of the
SmartDeal technology. The business of BANKEX in-
volves manufacturing fintech products and tokenizing
primarily financial assets, although we do not think
it impossible to apply the Proof-of-Asset Protocol in
other fields, with approval from the BANKEX Foun-
dation in case of non-financial Smart Assets. In our
case, first and foremost we create liquidity for finan-
cial assets.

1.4 Game Theory Behind the Proof-
of-Asset Protocol

Game Theory1 is a branch of mathematical eco-
nomics focusing on the outcomes of conflicts between
players, and the optimality of their strategies.

Game theory is one of the prime fundamental di-
rections in economics. 11 scientists specializing in
game theory have received the Nobel Memorial Prize
in Economic Sciences, including John Nash [4], [5],
responsible for introducing one of the key concepts
in game theory, known as the Nash equilibrium. It
is a state in which a single player cannot benefit by
changing strategy while the other players keep their
set of chosen strategies unchanged.

Analysis carried out according to game theory in-
dicates that the global financial market is currently
trapped in the sub-optimal equilibrium of the pris-
oner’s dilemma. This dilemma is a fundamental
problem of game theory, illustrating how players will
sometimes fail to cooperate even if it was in their best
interest.

We see that players in financial markets distrust
each other and keep overpaying for an inefficient set
of various ratings, scores and audits, although these
are frequently wrong (as with the Enron scandal and
the subprime mortgage crisis). This inefficiency leads
to high costs and often losses, which in turn raise the
cost of capital and lead to a lack of access to capital
for decentralized small businesses or borrowers. An-
other issue derived from this dilemma is the obstruct-
ing cost of deployment to the public market. If this
barrier is removed, then the market itself is cable to
evaluate every asset based on the collective wisdom of
all trading participants, as the increase in volume of
transparent and authentic trade operations provides
more information that can be used by the market to
verify the assets.

We offer a solution — the Proof-of-Asset Proto-
col, the point of which is an instant audit of the
asset. Now every investor is aware of the status of
his investments in non-public companies and assets.
Equipped with this tool, the market will force certain
businesses to change (lawyers, accounting, auditors,
and in separate cases banks and collectors). What is
our plan? We will begin by modernizing the mecha-
nisms of assigning and validating ratings, as the cash
flow recorded on the blockchain using the Proof-of-
Asset protocol is transparent, understandable, as well
as much faster and cheaper. In essence, the asset’s
state is being constantly monitored by the logic of
smart-contracts.

In turn, the increased amount of information on
economical operations and their authenticity grant
new opportunities for the development of an econom-
ical AI, building sufficiently precise artificial intelli-
gence systems for risk evaluation, making the cost of
such calculations approach zero. This would enable
the creation of a competitive market of economical
AI working for the good of modern society.

2 Modern Financial Markets

2.1 Bank-as-a-Service (BaaS) Busi-
ness Model

Bank-as-a-Service (BaaS ) is a business model that
makes it possible to build new financial products that
are integrated with multiple existing technological so-
lutions and jurisdictions.

On one side of these platforms are originators in
various jurisdictions with various technologies, and
on the other are fintech-companies wishing to launch
a new product or expand to a new market. Thanks
to the platform, they are able to do this quickly and
efficiently, without the need to work out integration
with the legislation of every country and every new
bank from scratch. Since the platform already con-
tains technological and legal integration, it can pro-
vide access to a new player more cheaply and more
quickly.

The originator in the BaaS model is a store-
front, essentially establishing access to the end client,
be it a bank, a fintech company, an internet platform,
a stock exchange or an insurer. It is critical that
when building the BaaS business model, the origina-
tor of the platform maintains his client and access
to the client under his control, but at the same time
he provides the client with the most up-to-date and
competitive products on the market by the best tech

1 Game theory is the study of the ways in which interacting choices of economic agents produce outcomes with respect to the
preferences (or utilities) of those agents, where the outcomes in question might have been intended by none of the agents [6].

3



(fintech, IT) companies on the market. It’s an excel-
lent solution to preserve and monetize clients.

How does an end client see it? Like a bank — he
does not have to see the third party provider.

There exist several levels of integration of partici-
pants of the BaaS model: from primitive analogue in-
tegration, where an employee would have to re-enter
data into a separate service, to fully automated inte-
gration. The originator makes the choice of whichever
model of work with an end client is most beneficial
to him, either where the end client is shown that the
company he is interacting with provides services by
outside service providers, or where the end client sees
the entire product line under the originator’s brand.

Some researchers call this conception “The Lego
Bank” which owns no pieces but assembles the pieces
into different form factors. The constituent pieces are
all the same. It is how you put the pieces together
that makes the difference. Like Lego, you can build
the pieces into a Castle, a House or a Winnebago.
It’s all about how you click pieces together [8].

As a result, the Bank-as-a-Service platform is a
unified window, where corporate or retail clients can
choose and receive services that are being offered by
various banks and tech companies in various coun-
tries. This platform takes over technical and legal
integration of various players on the financial mar-
ket.

2.2 Decentralized BaaS Model
According to McKinsey & Co., there are three main
trends in banking evolution:

• automation;

• increased regulation;

• increased pace of technological development.

Blockchain allows to automate different processes
and banks can benefit from it a lot. Accounting, legal
and risk parts might be automated. McKinsey & Co.
states that blockchain, based on advanced cryptogra-
phy, might allow doing such operations in the most
effective, safe and transparent way in human history.

For global players, adaptation to such
trends will become a vital issue. Enhanced fi-
nancial regulation will force participants to use part-
ner BaaS platforms as adaptation to new jurisdic-
tions independently will become prohibitively expen-
sive. Fast tech development, which many of the banks
can’t handle, will drive banks interest in using other
fintech companies’ services. It will drive a demand
for BaaS usage.

Decentralized BaaS is the future of bank-
ing. Why? The world has changed and financial

streams are becoming global. They are no longer
easily controlled by common tools. Regulators and
central banks, defining the movement of the market,
are responding to this with more strict regulations.
In turn, banks respond by creating as many service
offerings as permitted by their license beyond their
confines. They aim to create innovative services, leav-
ing only themselves with just the core.

This trend creates the risk of a bank evolving into
something more similar to a telecommunication com-
pany — a company with a license that no longer sees
its clients.

At BANKEX we see this risk, but believe it is
right for banks to preserve the status of the most im-
portant key element of the world’s financial ecosys-
tem. Fintech and IT companies should not be dis-
rupters of the banking system. Instead they should
supplement each other in a mutually beneficial way.

Several years ago, banks and innovative technolo-
gies existed separately, with banks expressing an in-
terest in external IT products such as certain sepa-
rate features. Today the market has changed, lead-
ing banks of the world work more and more closely
with fintech companies, while the fintech companies
in turn ceased to see themselves as disruptors tri-
umphing over banks and instead view themselves as
partners to banks. Everyone acknowledges that of-
fline bank departments will remain, even if nobody
goes to them, as foundations of faith in the system.
A customer must understand that the financial ser-
vice he receives is that of a bank, the bank actually
exists, it has a department in the city, to which the
customer can go in case of an issue for assistance.
This reason at least will remain. This isn’t just a
domain that might close tomorrow and leave its end
client alone with their issue. On the other hand, fin-
tech and blockchain companies acknowledge that the
market share occupied by their products is too small,
below 10%, and in order to amplify it, they must
partner with banks.

In other words, fintech products must end up at
banks. Clients, in turn, will purchase and use inno-
vative financial products much more willingly if they
can do so under the brand of a familiar bank. It’s
worth noting that some banks will remain skeptical
about integration with fintech companies. Luckily,
the banking community understands that fighting in-
novation will only result in market share loss.

On the other hand, FinTech innovation alone is
not sufficient to absorb the exorbitant transaction
flows and and vast financial streams. One expla-
nation is that banks don’t trust one another and
they don’t trust technological companies. They are
afraid of losing their client-base by partnering with
a stronger or more technologically advanced player.

4



They are concerned that upon close examination their
products will not be competitive compared to alter-
natives. They are afraid regulators would penalize
them for use of innovations in their base products.
Another important note is that decisions regarding
such risks are made by top-managers, most of whom
are more concerned with protecting their reputation
than introducing innovation.

Technological progress has presented us with so-
lutions to such issues — organizing mutual trust of
participants in the system and trust in operations in
the system based on decentralized data storage and
automated smart-contracts.

Many professional market players admit that a de-
centralized BaaS business-model is an optimal path
to collaboration between classic banks and financial
companies with cutting edge IT companies and con-
tinually growing decentralized technological compa-
nies of the future.

Front service of clients remains in the hands of
the banks, while products are presented by narrowly-
oriented product banks or companies.

We believe that the B2B2C combination of
business-models and technologies is the key to
BANKEX’s success.

2.3 Classical Microservice Architec-
ture

Microservice architecture is a network of module ser-
vices that can be deployed independently from one
another.

Microservice architecture is an approach to struc-
turing applications whereby they are broken down
into smaller independent internal components.

Advantages of Microservice Architecture:

• autonomous ownership for different microser-
vices within an application;

• agility, application micro-components can be
developed and tested in autonomous decentral-
ized teams much faster;

• improved scalability (scaling independent of
other components, on-demand scaling);

• continuous delivery and deployment of micro-
components.

A monolithic architecture is much easier in imple-
mentation, control and deployment, while microser-
vices require careful management, as they are de-
ployed on different servers and use API.

Such architecture allows technically complicated
applications to constantly evolve without the need to
wait for the release of a new version of the product to
make changes. There is no need to release an updated
version of the product, if the changes apply only to
a small part of the product. That’s why it’s possi-
ble to customize for various business tasks of every
enterprise, department or person.

Notably, microservices can be fully managed by
different teams in compliance with different standards
and are also more available: even if one of them
crashes, it does not lead to the crash of the entire
application. A unified architecture facilitates work
in situations where multiple modules need to inter-
act with one another, or where classes need to be
transferred from one module to another. At the same
time microservices can guarantee that there will be
no shared states between the modules. Finally, mi-
croservices allow you to use multiple technologies and
languages, depending on business needs (Figure 1).

2.4 Blockchain Serviсe Architecture
On an Ethereum blockchain micro-service, architec-
ture is used in the implementation of external ora-
cles. At the same time, the Ethereum network is
itself an example of network that uses the concept of
micro-services, since it contains all the characteristic
features of micro-services (Figure 2):

• excess and reservation, as each node of the net-
work is autonomous;

• service discovery for automatic configuration of
network topology;

• extensibility through the use of other types of
micro-services (such as oracles, micro-services
allowing to display statistics, etc.).

The logic of the BANKEX liquidity protocol is
based on the concept of the Ethereum smart con-
tract2, and accordingly uses all of its infrastruc-
ture advantages. At the same time, technically, the
BANKEX protocol is a series of smart contract up-
dates, however these smart contract updates are not
micro-services themselves, the micro-services are in
relation between API calls themselves. From our
side, the business tasks of the protocol, which re-
quire a classical micro-service architecture, are real-
ized through the creation of the oracle system. Pro-
tocol oracles are designed strictly according to the
principles of the micro-services, that is, the instances
of these oracles should be automatically added un-
der the required conditions. In this case, dynamic

2 The phrase “smart contract” was coined by Nick Szabo initially in [10] and later in [9].

5



Microservice Architecture

DB

Monolythic Architecture

DB DBDB

UI

UI

Business Logic

Data Access Level

Microservice A Microservice B Microservice C

Microservice D

Figure 1: Monolythic vs. Microservice Architecture

Ethereum Network

Client Node

Miner

Client Node

Client Node

Client Node

Miner

...

Client Node

Miner

Client Node

Miner

Client Node

Miner

Client Node

Client Node

...

...

Oracle

Web3j

Oracle

Web3j

Node Management Data

Figure 2: Blockchain Microservice Architecture

6



balancing of the number of oracle instances is used.
Part of the BANKEX oracles is implemented on the
basis of Microsoft Azure cloud technologies, since it’s
one of the most bank friendly platforms. An example
of the protocol logic was realized through the interac-
tion with the signals from Internet of Things sensors.

But for the description of the BANKEX Proof-
of-Asset protocol the definition of the micro-service
architecture is not entirely correct. BANKEX team
calls it the Blockchain Service Architecture.

Blockchain Service Architecture is a sequence
of smart contracts, every step of which can be cus-
tomized by a predetermined pool of actors validated
for the particular step of the included smart con-
tracts, while the contents of contracts in a step and
the number of steps are embedded in the business
logic necessary to tokenize the Smart Asset.

It is an asset tokenization constructor, but one
that only works in a sequence of smart contracts cor-
rectly arranged after one another, supplemented with
oracles connected as micro-services.

This allows to tokenize an asset with maximum
precision and transparency for all participants of the
market, while also working in line with the open
source BANKEX Proof-Of-Asset protocol.

2.5 Complexity regulation of the
Blockchain Service Architecture

We often hear from technical experts: Your protocol
is too complicated. Other technical gurus say — your
protocol is too simple. Yes, they are correct. The
complexity of the BANKEX protocol, which is based
on the Blockchain Service Architecture, is regulated
by the increase/decrease in the number of smart con-
tracts in the tokenization logic (Figure 3).

The creation of a smart asset of a certain type
does not necessary use all the steps that are laid out
in the Blockchain Service Architecture, only the steps
of the smart contract chain that are required by a par-
ticular Smart Asset are used. The simplest Smart As-
set consists of three steps: initialization, validation,
and valuation. And in this case the Smart Asset will
fulfill its mission — make the asset liquid. It’s not
complicated at all.

At the same time, BANKEX is an old company
in the sphere of financial technologies, classic fintech.
We know very well how complex financial tools can
be, and how difficult it is to properly formalize them.
Our solution is the Blockchain Service Architecture —
exactly what you need. You can add any level of
complexity to the asset tokenization chain which will
result in a Smart Asset.

Moreover, the Smart Asset retains all the features
of a blockchain Smart Contract — everyone is able to
see what value is behind it and how truthful it is.

You can add your own logic block to the
BlockchainService chain — Proof-of-Asset Protocol,
because it is an open source code. To do that — you
will need to address the BANKEX Foundation com-
munity.

2.6 Benefits of the Blockchain Service
Architecture

Why would the service architecture of the fu-
ture use blockchain? In the existing infrastruc-
ture, a large application or product consists of a large
number of modules which are almost always devel-
oped by different teams, and, even if the teams work
within the same bank, they still requires a large num-
ber of cash flows between different participants in the
system and a large amount of agreements and inspec-
tions. It is costly, time consuming, and very likely to
result in mistakes, including system errors.

Blockchain helps automate the chain of transac-
tions, increasing reliability, transaction transparency
and removing inefficiencies and bureaucratic hurdles.
It lowers the risk of human mistakes and for many
operations completely removes the need for human
intervention. This will make your business faster,
lower your costs and increase the market’s trust in
you.

Finally, Blockchain Service Architecture will allow
you to build, in the best way, a product line fitting
with the trend of personalization and to offer unique
solutions to consumers exactly when they really need
it.

Blockchain technologies are perfectly suited for
this task, as they provide an infrastructure with an
open register of immutable operations. The first re-
lease of the Proof-of- Asset protocol relies on the es-
tablished technology of open blockchains, most im-
portantly Ethereum. Technologies for the creation
of private blockchains are currently on their way to
becoming established and accepted by the industry.
Thus the first release focuses on the tokenization
of open assets. In the future, the algorithm will
be adapted to private blockchains in line with their
readiness for industrial application.

We see the current issues with financial instru-
ments from within; we see how many inefficiencies
exist between market participants. Our mission is
to provide technologies that market participants will
like, that will improve upon the current market struc-
ture, and that will enable the same people — the same
market participants, to interact more efficiently and,
above all, more profitably.

7



Smart
Contract

1.1

Smart
Contract

1.2

Smart
Contract

2.1

Smart
Contract

2.2

Smart
Contract

2.3

Smart
Contract
(N-1).1

Smart
Contract

N.1

Smart
Contract

N.2

Smart
Contract

N

Smart
Contract

N-1

Smart
Contract

2

Smart
Contract

1

Verification IoT IoT

Additional
Information

Initial
Information

Asset Owner

Smart Contract

External
Data Sources

...

...

Figure 3: Blockchain SA Smart Contract Chain

2.7 Liquidity Theory in the Context
of Tokenization

Liquidity of an asset is the ability to sell or buy the
asset quickly without significant change in its price.
Higher liquidity alleviates the trade-off between the
price of an asset it can be sold/bought for and the
speed of its sale. People have preference for liquidity,
such a theory was first introduced by John Maynard
Keynes [3]. Many theories and empirical studies sug-
gest that lower liquidity results in underrated value
stored in assets [1].

Making these assets more liquid will help unlock
the value.

Protocol of liquidity is a derivative of what we re-
fer to as The BANKEX Proof-of-Asset protocol. We
call it that because today, unless it possesses a cer-
tain description of characteristics, it is fairly difficult
to sell an asset, even if at first glance it appears liq-
uid. For instance, a new consumer good, as an asset,
is fully liquid — all one needs to do is list it in an on-
line store, making it possible for an end client to buy
it. But not all types of assets and even not all of the
simplest consumer goods have deliberately truthful
characteristics and a capacity for digitization. The
most common example, a used consumer good, re-
quires at least a description of changes to its base
characteristics, and then the buyer needs to be con-

vinced that the description of the good is truthful.
This, as a result, requires the buyer to check the de-
scribed characteristics in order to make a purchasing
decision. This happens because this “asset” is not
digitized at the outset, so the mechanics of selling it
become more complicated, compared to the sale of a
similar new asset.

To address this problem, various niche technolog-
ical services emerged that assist in making an as-
set more liquid, while also facilitating trust between
each sides of the deal. Services do this in different
ways, from simple announcement boards, to complex
internet-services with risk insurance included. These
services make an asset “understandable” to the mar-
ket, after which said asset becomes significantly more
liquid than it initially is.

This is an example of digitization of an asset giv-
ing it liquidity.

But tokenization is different from digitization:
digitization is about creating descriptions, its con-
sumer characteristics, photographing etc. Tokeniza-
tion, beyond the aforementioned steps, adds financial
components — automated smart contracts for deal ex-
ecution, commands for automatic transactions, for-
mulas for calculation of the asset price, automatic
validation of the initial data and much more.

So, digitization is about asset description and its

8



publishing on the market. Tokenization is about asset
description, validation by oracles, asset price calcula-
tion, automated audit, calculation of cash flows based
on its price, execution of the SmartDeal.

One of the major reasons for tokenization of an
asset is the possibility to avoid fraud that may be
present in the case of classic digitization. A good can
be digitized but might also contain false information
in its description. Often it is difficult for an asset
owner to see the real information about cash flows
even if there is no intention to hide them. BANKEX
Proof-of-Asset Protocol provides the proof that an
asset and its cash flows are authentic.

We remind you that this BANKEX White Paper
uses examples and demonstrations only as demon-
strative examples of the SmartDeal technology. The
business of BANKEX involves manufacturing fintech
products and tokenizing primarily financial assets,
although we do not think it impossible to apply
the Proof-of-Asset Protocol in other fields, with ap-
proval from the BANKEX Foundation in case of non-
financial Smart Assets.

2.8 Mathematical Market Making
Models for Smart Asset

What is market making?

Market maker is a player on a market for a good or
security who provides both buy and sell opportuni-
ties for traders, thus making this market more liquid.
Market makers hold both the security/good and cash
in inventories in order to be able to take the oppo-
site side of trading order volume to fix imbalance in
buy and sell orders. Market-makers earn on bid-ask
spreads, but bear the risks of price decline of their
inventories.

Key players:

• traders: responsible for creation of purchas-
ing/sell orders;

• market makers (specialists): display public buy
& sell quotations for a guaranteed number of se-
curities/goods to traders and fulfill orders from
traders at these quotations;

• dealers: buy and sell securities/goods from
traders but do not disclose quotes publicly;

• brokers: carry out orders on behalf of their
clients.

Liquid trade is of great importance for the stabil-
ity and effectiveness of financial markets.

Market making is an established trading practice,
which has inspired much research, both theoretical

and empirical. Most of the theoretical research pa-
pers model market maker as a single player with
whom other market players can trade, with no trad-
ing activity apart from that. On the other hand,
there are some research papers where market mak-
ers compete with middlemen (dealers/brokers). In
this model, the author introduces market-makers to
a model by D. Spulber with buyers, sellers and deal-
ers.

A number of researchers have focused on the op-
timal behavior of a market maker (specialist). Some
papers examine the effect of risk aversion and inven-
tory on the pricing policies of a market maker. In
another paper, the authors study the profitability of
market making strategies. Other researchers model
bid-ask spread as a need to compensate for losses due
to adverse selection problem: traders who engage in
trade with a market-maker might know information
that the market maker does not know.

Recent papers have focused on combining finan-
cial market maker model with the field of artificial
intelligence; high frequency trading has made a sig-
nificant footprint in market-marking models. For ex-
ample, Abraham Othman combines two concepts —
automated market making from the artificial intelli-
gence literature and risk measures from the finance
literature. In another paper, the author studies the
impact of high frequency market making on liquidity,
price discovery and institutional traders’ returns.

Benefits of market making:

• liquidity provision (buyers and sellers do not
need to make orders simultaneously);

• reduction in dealers’ bid-ask spreads due to MM
publicly quoting prices;

• less uncertainty due to market maker displaying
quotes publicly;

• lower search costs because traders do not need
to search other traders or dealers to sell at good
price;

• market maker can tax and subsidize transac-
tions by changing bid and ask prices;

• lower transaction costs for all players due to
centralized exchange;

• lower market volatility because fluctuations of
demand and supply are smoothed.

9



Examples of market makers today

They also play a major role in stock exchanges, and
historically exchanges have often appointed trading
firms to act as official market makers for specific eq-
uities:

• market makers typically either own or are mem-
bers of an exchange such as the New York Stock
Exchange or the Chicago Board of Trade;

• NYSE designates a single market maker for
each stock, known as the specialist for that
stock. In contrast, NASDAQ allows several
market makers for each stock;

• HFT firms buy and sell simultaneously profit-
ing from spreads, thus they are market makers,
however, without formally being designated so.
They forecast increases in buy orders volume,
buy before other buyers and then sell to them
at a higher price.

The BANKEX Proof-of-Asset Protocol includes
Smart Asset Exchange, support of liquidity of
Smart Assets being traded within the protocol is an
important task for BANKEX. It’s important to note
that market making to support liquidity of Smart As-
sets in OrderBook is a more complex task than it is on
a classic stock market. This is due to certain types of
Smart Assets having more characteristics that affect
price, than the classic balance of supply and demand.

Another significant note is that the BANKEX
Proof-of-Asset Protocol is based on the Ethereum
blockchain, meaning Smart Asset tokens issued in the
ecosystem of BANKEX can be traded on any market
supporting the ERC20 standard.

3 Target assets for tokenization

3.1 Types of Assets and Asset Re-
quirements

Everything in our world is relatively liquid. The Fig-
ure 4 is taken from a report [7] by Blockstone — one
of the biggest equity funds in USA, demonstrating
that everything is liquid and has a duration of sale.
They mention that investing into assets that could
seem insufficiently liquid at first may in fact result in
greater profitability than other assets.

We see that selling public equities takes several
seconds, bonds can be sold within a day, municipal
bonds would take weeks or months. Private equi-
ties — 10 years, real estate — 5–10 years, objects of
infrastructure such as bridges, roads or factories –
tens of years. Works of art may wait for their buyer
more than 50 years.

In this situation, blockchain tokens which can be
bought and sold on a decentralized blockchain in less
than 10–30 minutes, are an opportunity to tokenize
everything that currently takes longer than that to
sell.

The potential tokenization market includes every-
thing that sells over days, weeks or years. Mean-
ing potential for the tokenization market is enor-
mous. The issue currently being addressed by the
best blockchains in the world — Ethereum and Bit-
coin, the issue of having to wait several minutes to
receive several transaction confirmations, is no issue
to us.

Asset Tokenization does not work on the market
of assets liquid enough to be sold in seconds. The
Market Opportunity of BANKEX Asset Tokenization
stands to the right of Tokens on Figure 5.

We therefore do not compete or fight for the as-
sets that take seconds to sell. This is the market of
Ripple3 — the world’s only enterprise blockchain so-
lution for global payments. To them, instantaneous
transactions are key, unlike liquidity of Smart Assets
during tokenization, where a few seconds don’t mat-
ter.

In our opinion, target assets for tokenization can
include classes of assets with summary capitalization
exceeding 100 million USD.

3.2 Choosing a Role in New Economy:
Coin or Smart Asset

We receive hundreds of requests: can our business in
the real sector be tokenized and how? Many business
owners see an opportunity to fund their business us-
ing crypto economics via ICO or ITO. Experienced
businessmen understand this capital to them is sig-
nificantly less costly compared to classical sources of
capital and is also associated with less administrative
risk, as the business decision making center stays in
the hands of the owner. In crypto economics there
can be no board of directors with members who are
non-amicable to you.

3 Ripple provides global financial settlement solutions to enable the world to exchange value like it already exchanges infor-
mation — giving rise to an Internet of Value (IoV). Ripple solutions lower the total cost of settlement by enabling banks to
transact directly, instantly and with certainty of settlement. Banks around the world are partnering with Ripple to improve
their cross-border payment offerings, and to join the growing, global network of financial institutions and market makers laying
the foundation for the Internet of Value. https://ripple.com/xrp/

10



Figure 4: Everything Is (Relatively) Liquid
Based on [7], source: [2]. For illustrative purposes only

Figure 5: Realizing the Value of Liquid Assets Takes Time

11



In terms of forming a new economy, BANKEX
sees a solution to real business funding in separat-
ing technological and infrastructure projects from
projects in the field of business operating industrial
and manufacturing assets. Technological and infras-
tructure projects that can help decentralized econ-
omy develop and become bigger, more convenient, as
well as expand usage of technology over the globe can
definitely receive funding via ICO. But what about
projects in the real economy segment that require to-
kenization, but lack strong technological teams, ex-
perienced IT founders, financial evangelists?

We all know the crowdsale mechanism will only
work with influential founders, powerful ideas and a
fully transparent vision of the project’s technological
realization.

The answer is obvious: use the technology and
infrastructure of core projects in decentralized econ-
omy, including ones utilizing an open source protocol.
The BANKEX Proof-of-Asset Protocol is precisely
this kind of solution.

We present to you the procedure of creating a
Smart Asset — ISAO (Initial Smart Asset Offer-
ing) based on decentralization protocols, such as the
BANKEX Proof-of-Asset Protocol. Your asset, even
if it’s an offline business, will be able to attract re-
sources by tokenizing its assets using already made
powerful technological protocols. You don’t need an
ICO procedure, instead you can perform Asset Tok-
enization of your business using ISAO.

It’s simple. Use Smart Asset.
Businesses (farms, stores, manufacturing enter-

prises) referred to as Smart Assets in our White Pa-
per can be tokenized as part of the ISAO procedure,
subsequently forming anAsset Community and re-
ceiving returns via Smart Deal.

3.3 Requirements and Options for As-
set Tokenization

Over the years, working in classic fintech, we have be-
come accustomed to always seek situations that have
some sort of problem. Today, we realize that in each
of these searches, we would also effectively seek out
a problem that prevented an asset from being truly
liquid.

Below are several problems, causing a decrease of
an asset’s liquidity, and the more of the below quali-
ties your asset has – the more attractive tokenization
of such an asset would be.

Tokenization of assets gains the greatest value un-
der the following conditions:

(a) Presence of a large number of asset owners.
This means the asset has multiple owners who
can have difficulty reaching a consensus.

(b) Distributed asset. You own several office build-
ings that are rented out several rooms at a time.
You can easily see the authenticity of cash flow
from the entire asset, but you may find it very
difficult, even downright impossible, to figure
out the authenticity of cash flow from a single
office room.

(c) Standardized end product. This would allow
us to identify meta-information when creating
a Smart Asset. It’s important for us to be able
to bring it to a single basis.

(d) Fungibility (tradability). The possibility of
trading one for another. One asset for another
asset, since you as an owner are not concerned
with what the asset is. What matters is the
cash flow provided by this asset.

(e) Use of token as a mean of payment for end-
product. An option that would allow the ISAO
token released not to be too similar to a pay-
ment obligation. A Smart Asset token insures
receiving payment, but it can also be used as
a means of payment. For example, it can be
bought to finance construction of a building,
but then this same token can be used to rent a
room in this building. As a result, it becomes
a utility token, which is important.

(f) Use of the token to own a large asset by a
high number of investors and easy means for
a buyer to exit co-ownership of a large asset.
If an asset can simultaneously be owned by a
large number of owners, then it’s makes entry
into asset ownership easier. A classical exam-
ple is shared ownership of large real estate or
non-public company shares. Entering such as-
sets with a small share is very complicated at
the time.

(g) Ability to automatically and unambiguously
measure characteristics that directly or indi-
rectly indicate a potential quantity and qual-
ity of end-products. The ability to integrate
regular IoT audit of an asset significantly in-
creases the quality of Smart Asset monitoring.
It’s a significant competitive advantage over au-
diting or rating agencies, whose annual surveys
become inferior to real-time IoT audit.

(h) Possibility to withdraw an asset from the owner
if the terms of the contract are not fulfilled.
This means that, aside from auditing a contract
and tokenizing with an escrow module, there is
the option of trading the asset, receiving collat-
eral or different contract conditions in the event
of a breach of terms.

12



(i) Control of end-product sales and minimization
of the possibility of sales that are not accounted
for. This feature does not suit all cases. What
this means is that the end product that is tok-
enized and funded is traced. In the event of tok-
enizing an agricultural asset such as strawberry,
IoT sensors need to be installed that would cal-
culate the number of grown berries to deter-
mine whether all of the manufactured berries
have brought the appropriate cash flow. These
IoT sensors must detect the entire lifetime of
an asset up to the generation of cash flow.

(j) Assets the transfer of which require high legal
and accounting expenditures. Early investors
frequently want to sell their assets at the peak
of profitability, while other investors are sim-
ilarly interested in entering ownership of said
assets. Tokenization will make such deals sig-
nificantly simpler and cheaper.

3.4 Example: Tokenizing Shares in
Non-Public Companies

To give an example of high suitability for tokeniza-
tion, let us examine late stage private shares that
have yet to go public. These are assets that require
very high legal, accounting and administration costs.

There are many investors in non-public companies
who, early ones in particular, are ready to sell their
shares, while other investors are interested in enter-
ing. But such companies are not public and their
shares cannot be traded on the public stock market.
Furthermore, they frequently can’t be resold without
the approval of company board, since company man-
agement must control who their private shareholders
are, and prevent their number from exceeding a cer-
tain quantity, because otherwise they would breach
the limit of investors and become a public company.

These limitations, born from the inefficiency of a
historically established system, are an inconvenience
to everyone involved — both the investors and the
company board. In particular, this inefficiency may
often lead to disagreements among shareholders and
the stalling of company development.

Blockchain technologies allow the necessary de-
tails on shares to be recorded in a Smart Contract.
Part of the company share, intended for early in-
vestors or investors with a miniscule share, is tok-
enized as an asset in a Smart Asset. Its nominal
holder can be any entity permitted by the legislation
of the company’s location, such as an SPV.

After that, from the nominal token-holder’s per-
spective, they can easily change upon reaching con-
sensus among themselves, as buyers or sellers of to-

kens of this Smart Asset. At the same time, share-
holders are essentially not changing. All presence
rights of token holders are passed to the SPV. For
non-public companies that don’t want changes in
their board of governing shareholders, obtaining liq-
uidity of their capital via tokenization of part of their
equity into a Smart Asset is essentially the only mutu-
ally acceptable option for all sides involved. For early
investors this method of investment becomes a new
step to decreasing investment risks, and as a result
increases the possibility of investment into formerly
unavailable assets.

3.5 Fundamental Advantage of Tok-
enization for an Asset

The analytical block of BANKEX, gathering and an-
alyzing financial technologies from all over the world
for several years, is seeing an interesting trend that
has been forming around financial tools during the
last few years.

If we take apart the basic needs of a person or a
company in terms of movement of funds, it would be
easy to discover that every person or company does
not have that many basic financial needs, namely:

• spending money;

• moving money;

• storing money;

• earning money.

By correlating these basic financial needs with the
current range of financial technologies it turns out
that today there is a strong leaning towards satura-
tion of certain needs with financial technologies:

• spending money — the need that is most sat-
urated and easiest to digitize. There are cur-
rently thousands of companies that help a per-
son or a company to easily and quickly spend
their money;

• moving money — similar in terms of satura-
tion, but this basic need has several unresolved
issues, including ones currently being addressed
by our colleagues at Ripple;

• storing money — the need for people and
companies to keep their money in their pock-
ets is virtually non-existent today, having fully
been digitized and moved to plastic cards and
a whole range of innovative solutions.

The BANKEX Proof-of-Asset Protocol allows
people and organizations to fulfill an important, vital
need — the need to earn money. By becoming part
of the Asset Community you will have the option of

13



earning, and thus realizing yourself in fields of your
choosing.

Cryptocurrencies solve the global issue of digitiza-
tion of the human need to earn money, and altogether
the emergence of cryptocurrencies is a technological
response, solving this fundamental issue.

SmartDeal based on open source Smart Asset by
the Proof-of-Asset Protocol is the next step. You will
be able to build your future with your own hands.

4 Originator, Product Owner
and Supplier

4.1 Schematic of the Proof-of-Asset
Protocol

In previous sections we have examined the Bank-as-
a-Service product model and the concept of Smart
Asset Tokenization. These are two big entities, so
you may want to know just how BANKEX combines
them in its protocol.

The Proof-of-Asset Protocol is the technology for
interaction of multiple sides that normally take part
in financial deals, but the most important, system-
forming sides of the protocol are these three:

• originator;

• supplier;

• product owner.

Let us examine them using the schematic depicted
on the Figure 6.

4.2 Originator

On the left side of the schematic is the asset. The
originator is the owner of the asset that is being to-
kenized. The BANKEX protocol allows for the orig-
inator to have different roles. On the schematic, for
example, the Originator is marked as an end client.

As we’ve already said, the originator is the owner
of the asset tokenized. But despite the originator be-
ing the owner of the asset being tokenized, he can also
serve as the storefront for products of other origina-
tors (types of tokenization - types of Smart Assets).
This is something we’ve discussed while examining
the BaaS model.

Normally the originator for financial assets is a
Bank, but even today it can be an internet-platform
(ecosystem), ecommerce, a fintech platform, a stock
exchange, a broker, an insurance company. Mean-
ing this is the company the end client goes to, the
owner of a client. Anyone can see this almost daily,

the simplest example being an IT-company or ecom-
merce offering their clients more and more new ser-
vices, including financial ones. They are originators.

It is also fair to assume that there is the option
of tokenizing an end client’s assets without the par-
ticipation of a product storefront. That’s why, based
on the methodology of processing data in blockchain
systems, we define two different types of originators
(Figure 7).

Originator Agent — an organization (such as a
bank), which serves as a storefront for an end client,
is the owner of client data or searches for clients wish-
ing to conduct tokenization.

Originator End client — an end client wishing
to create a Smart Asset in the BANKEX ecosystem,
which will be backed by an provided asset.

Several important notes

Both roles can be filled by one and the same organiza-
tion simultaneously. For instance, a bank tokenizing
assets that the bank itself owns.

From a technological standpoint it is also possi-
ble to omit the Originator Agent role in the event
of, for example, an end client owning a large asset
that they can tokenize themselves. To that end an
Originator End client asset needs to have sufficient
capitalization.

For small end clients, work through an Originator
Agent is the only possible method to create a liquid
Smart Asset. This will be discussed further, as we will
examine this very situation in the form of merging re-
quests into portfolios and, possibly, securitization.

It is also easy to see that tokenization is no threat
to Originator Agents, such as banks that are owners
of storefronts or end clients, but rather an opportu-
nity for them to provide their end clients with new
services and benefits in merging client requests (also
similar to securitization).

Thus the Originator in the protocol has the fol-
lowing characteristics:

• role: creator of the Smart Asset;

• function: providing asset for tokenization, ini-
tiating Smart Asset creation.

Here’s a simple example: a small business enter-
prise (SME ) Originator End client comes to a bank
Originator Agent wishing to receive a small business
enterprise loan Product (Smart Asset Type). The
bank has a product: small business enterprise loan
Product Instance 1, and receives the enterprise’s re-
quest. Next the bank has its scoring procedure for
this enterprise in order to make a decision on the loan,
but the results of scoring mean that the loan cannot

14



Figure 6: Asset — BANKEX — Exchange — Capital

Originator

Originator End Client
(customer, fund,

portfolio)

Originator Agent
(bank, ecom, fintech,

IT-ecosystem, etc.)

Smart Asset Type
(choose product,
tokenization type)

Figure 7: Asset Originator

be given according to the bank’s rules Product In-
stance 1. The bank automatically checks other avail-
able product instances fitting the request and finds
an alternative, such as small business crowdfunding
Product Instance 2, the requirements of which are
well suited for Originator End client. Then the deal
can be made.

As a result, the bank gives the client the product
they require, while also keeping their client and satis-
fying them, instead of turning them down and forcing
them to look for a different bank, which may lead to
irreversible loss of a client for the bank.

4.3 Product Owner: Vision

Product Owner — a company that creates various fin-
tech products. In the future it will become something
more - both the company and the community that
create product technologies together.

It’s a Solution provider, Product provider and fi-
nally Technology Provider. Mainly it is a company
that owns the technology of Smart Asset creation
based on the Blockchain Service Architecture and it

creates new types of Smart Assets for the Originator.

At the time of Summer 2017 the BANKEX
Proof-of-Asset Protocol ecosystem has two function-
ing Product Owners — daughter company Findeliv-
ery4 (founded in 2015) and BANKEX Lab (founded
in 2016). It was BANKEX Lab that created
the Smart Asset Types that you can try out
today by using the tokenization demo https://
dev-web-prototype-bankex.azurewebsites.net/

Obviously the mission of developing and creat-
ing all types of SmartAsset the world needs neither
can nor should be undertaken by the fintech team of
BANKEX Lab alone. That’s why it’s important to us
that more and more smart contract developers from
banks and fintech companies, as well as blockchain
community specialists join the Proof-of-Asset Proto-
col ecosystem.

BANKEX is creating the protocol architecture
with the goal of creating various types of Smart As-
sets and in our ideal vision of the future, every type of
asset will come to have an Asset Community formed
for its development, support and audit.

4 Findelivery (for Google: Findostavka) — fintech company on russian market. The company provides services: delivery of
bank cards, remote conclusion of contracts, remote offline KYC clients of the bank. The company has an operating profit.
https://findostavka.online/en

15



We must note that, for differing locations and ju-
risdictions the same Smart Asset (Product) would
have a differing Product Instance, because for the
moment different countries have different laws and le-
gal conditions for transaction processing. This means
an enormous number of tasks for developers, for pro-
grammers who will be working on the Smart Asset
code that will change the way deals are made in the
whole world.

Realization of this task is upon the BANKEX
Foundation. Every Product Owner can become part
of the BANKEX Foundation and make his own con-
tribution to the tokenization of deals worldwide. An
important function of the Asset Community in the
BANKEX Foundation is support of Product Owners
by providing access to product expertise and secu-
rity audit of the written smart contract code. CEO
of the BANKEX Foundation Petr Korolev5, success-
fully worked with the BANKEX Lab team to develop
one of the Product Instances of the protocol in Au-
gust 2017 at a hackathon. BANKEX’s Ethereum
storage of mortgage securities earned BANKEX first
prize6 of the blockchain hackathon from the hands
of Ethereum Foundation Council’s Vitalik Buterin.
During development the Blockchain Service Architec-
ture methodology was used, which allowed the cre-
ation of a superior quality Product Instance from
scratch both significantly quicker and more efficiently
than other competitors.

It’s important to remember that Product Owner,
just like separate Product Instances, is a business. A
Product Owner can issue Smart Asset tokens, and
subsequently provide product expertise, offer audit
services or technical support for his Smart Asset Type
together with the BANKEX Foundation.

4.4 Product Owner: Certification

Obviously, both Product and Product Instances cre-
ated by the Product Owner based on the Proof-of-
Asset Protocol must be certified. This is particularly
important for financial Smart Assets. That’s why the
ecosystem includes the Smart Asset Certification
Center (SACC ).

The mission of the certification center is to en-
sure the security of Smart Assets created. Today
we can see an industry paradox, which is that the
blockchain, created as a technological solution to en-
sure, first and foremost, the security of transactions,
is frequently attacked, and such attacks are occasion-
ally successful. We understand that this is the issue of
blockchain technology’s rapid development and new

solutions must stand the test of time.
To solve this issue BANKEX utilizes the con-

cept of the Smart Asset Certification Center. Its
key mission is a synergy of interaction between classi-
cal financial institutions and the newest decentralized
communities.

This concept is already functioning today. De-
spite being an innovative approach, we have already
turned to it in reality several times. Here’s how it
works. On the one hand, BANKEX is a classical
fintech company, known and valued in many classi-
cal banks and financial institutes.On the other hand,
founders of BANKEX are all fairly experienced mem-
bers of the blockchain community.

This allows synergy when evaluating the Solidity
of open source code of new Smart Assets. Here’s how
it is done currently:

• first, the Product Owner creates the Smart As-
set code and the code goes to BANKEX Lab;

• next, BANKEX Lab conducts code analysis us-
ing in-house programmers;

• next, even after the brilliant technical exper-
tise of BANKEX Lab’s inhouse team, the pro-
gram code is sent for audit to our partners with
old school global technology consultancy, re-
ceiving feedback on code quality from top level
IT specialists working with leading technologi-
cal brands in the world;

• next step, the updated code is sent to
be checked by programmers from several
blockchain communities. Their experience is
priceless. Almost all of them have had a chance
to learn the price of Smart Contract bugs on
their own wallets;

• as the final step of the code audit, the code is
validated together with all suggested fixes from
all sources by members of the BANKEX Foun-
dation together with the Asset Community and
other friendly blockchain foundations.

This process may at first glance seem to take more
time to validate the Smart Asset code’s quality, but
when you are steeped in the atmosphere of blockchain
research and development, you come to realize that in
greenfield smart product development experience of
programmers with various training backgrounds al-
lows to achieve impressive results and optimal code
quality as quickly as possible.

5 GitHub of Petr Korolev: https://github.com/skywinder
6 GitHub of the winning solution: https://github.com/BankEx/Blockchain-Hackathon-Kazan

16



Resulting from the work of the Smart Asset Certi-
fication Center, you receive a guarantee of the Smart
Asset code’s safety from Bankex, a company well
known and recognized by the global financial commu-
nity and listed among the top 50 fintech companies
worldwide7.

It can be added that the BANKEX team, being a
pioneer on the market of legally valid audit of Smart
Assets, understands that audit of blockchain-based
smart contracts is a new and enormous industry that
will augment and possibly replace the existing order
of business consulting. We are ready to work in this
direction with all players interested in smart contract
security, from community teams to consulting lead-
ers.We have no agreements with consulting on paper,
but we are negotiating these matters with virtually
all the world leaders of consulting and audit, such as
Microsoft, E&Y, PWC, Deloitte and others. Their
interest in this topic over the last year has greatly in-
creased and that is the correct approach for everyone.

4.5 Product Owner: Basic Informa-
tion

In the last few segments we have determined the mis-
sion of the Product Owner — it’s a company that cre-
ates various products, meaning types of Smart Assets
based on the Proof-of-Asset Protocol.

The Product Owner has the following character-
istics in the protocol:

• role: technology owner;

• function: to provide technology to Origina-
tors in order to tokenize assets. To create
various Products and Product Instances on
the BANKEX for members of the BANKEX
ecosystem. Every Product Owner is a mem-
ber of the BANKEX Foundation. Products
and Product Instances that come from Prod-
uct Owners must be certified using the Smart
Asset Certification Center.

Let us examine the Product Owner from an initial
data standpoint using the schematic on Figure 8.

A new Product Owner joining the Smart Asset
ecosystem must provide basic registration info. To
become a member of the BANKEX Foundation this
needs to be a company with a registered legal entity
and a bank account.

Code of products created by the Product Owner
can go not only through a BANKEX audit, but also
audit of other organizations and community teams
via the Smart Asset Certification Center.

Product — a Smart Asset Token, consisting of a
chain of smart contracts, based on the Blockchain
Service Architecture methodology and the rules of
the BANKEX Proof-of-Asset Protocol. The method-
ology gives the option of creating a Smart Asset on
any blockchain, but currently all Smart Assets are be-
ing created by the BANKEX team on the Ethereum
blockchain.

Formulas written into the product set the rules
for product info that has to be digitized by the Orig-
inator and Supplier during tokenization, determining
the interconnection between three of the main entities
of the protocol.

We call this “Smart Asset initialization data”.

4.6 Product Owner: Smart Asset
Catalog

After examining the entity of the Product Owner,
we now understand that the Proof-of-Asset Proto-
col is able to realize a multitude of product solutions
and Product Instances depending on application, lo-
cation and legal conditions. The number of Product
Instances is not limited, so to introduce the Product
in a new country or account for a change in current
legal conditions, the Product Owner needs only up-
date the Smart Asset formulas and releases a new
Product Instance.

With time a large number of Product Instances is
going to form for every Smart Asset Type and this
number will form a product catalogue that the pro-
tocol’s ecosystem will interact with. The BANKEX
team calls this the “Smart Asset Catalog”.

Let’s examine how members of the BANKEX
ecosystem interact with the Smart Asset Catalog us-
ing a schematic.

As you can see, we have the BANKEX Lab Prod-
uct Owner 1, which, for instance, has created a Smart
Asset — Blockchain KYC Product. This technology
is going to be listed in the Smart Asset Catalog Prod-
uct Catalog of the Proof-of-Asset Protocol catalogue.
This is very similar to Product Containers utilized in
classical banking development.

Let’s say that next two companies came to the
ecosystem: Company A from Japan and Company B
from USA with the intention to sell the Blockchain
KYC technology Product in their countries. For these
companies and, more importantly, together with
them as they have better understanding of the partic-
ular traits of business in their country, the BANKEX
Lab Product Owner 1 develops a Blockchain KYC
Product solution for the Japanese market Product In-
stance 1 as well as a solution for the US market Prod-

7 According to “Top 50 Financial IT Pathfinder Ranking” [11]

17



Product Owner (bank, fintech)

Product

Product
registration data

Setup Originator
product data

Product audit by BankEx
Foundation adn other Escrow

Setup Supplier
product data

Product

Smart Asset Tokenization and Other Magic

Figure 8: Product Owner

uct Instance 2. Next let’s imagine some time after
the above a fintech lab called Another Lab Product
Owner 2 develops a Smart Asset for the Blockchain
KYC technology Product, which gives this technol-
ogy new consumer features, which could be either
superior or inferior to the predecessor. In order to
introduce this new technology to the Proof-of-Asset
Protocol ecosystem, Another Lab Product Owner 2
chooses the country and jurisdiction where they wish
to apply their solution, and they find an integrator,
Company D.

Company D is, for instance, a company on the
market of Singapore, where it realizes its solution
Product Instance 3, which updates the product cata-
log for the Blockchain KYC technology Product with
a new instance.

It’s important to note that Smart Asset pioneers
who hold the role of Product Owners of their tech-
nologies can realize Product Instances for the first so-
lutions on their own, without the need to involve third
party integrators. Decentralized Product technol-
ogy allows to perform integration in the most efficient
way possible, skipping steps that would not apply to
a particular situation.

Now let’s examine the Smart Asset Catalog from
a competition standpoint. Obviously instances on
markets of different countries will have little to no
competition amongst themselves. They are located
in different countries the markets of which are, for
now, developing independently. But it’s also obvious
that Product Owners who harness the technology of
building Smart Assets will begin to expand to newer
and newer markets, utilizing new integration part-
ners. With the technology developing further there
will come a day when several Product Instances form
in the same country and the same legal field. This

will serve as the push to technological competition
between Smart Assets.

There will come a future age of competition be-
tween Smart Asset Tokens dedicated to the same
Smart Asset Type. In this competition of fully digi-
tized and tokenized assets, the main competitive ad-
vantage would be the actual performance of the as-
set, as well as the outstanding algorithms and value
calculation formulas of Smart Assets and subsequent
Smart Deals. Competitive advantages of the old
world that are achieved through a different kind of
benefits will become a thing of the past. This is
an enormous quality increase for people in the whole
world, as they will have access to assets distinguished
by their performance.

On the side of the BANKEX Proof-of-Asset Pro-
tocol ecosystem the Instance Switcher block comes
into play, responsible for switching between Product
Instances within a single product container. Within
the Instance Switcher, Product Instances are pro-
cessed and arranged, filtered based on various pa-
rameters, competing among themselves for buyer re-
quests. Inside the Instance Switcher every product
container has its own Instance Trigger that selects
optimal Product Instances out of those available for
a product based on the criteria set by the client.

Until now we have observed the Smart Asset Cat-
alog top to bottom, from the Product Owner to the
Product Catalog, but with the emergence of compet-
ing Product Instances the logic of analysis changes
instead and we go from bottom to top, seeing the
picture of product choice in its entirety. As competi-
tion emerges, it’s the consumer who determines which
Product Instance he will choose, and that is exactly
how the process of bidding begins within a single type
of Smart Assets. The Instance Switcher can therefore

18



be viewed as an analogue of the classical order book.
A buyer’s request falls into this order book following
the client’s product choice.

This is how a decentralized product exchange be-
gins — the Smart Asset Exchange.

4.7 Supplier

On the right side of the schematic presented in section
4.1 of the Smart White Paper we see the Supplier.

The supplier is the owner of the tokenized prod-
uct.

BANKEX engineers have conducted research of
entities and characteristics of resources presently used
in various financial and internet ecosystems and have
reached amazing results. We have discovered that
our typical perception of the resource taking part in
deals as financial resource only is too limited.

Perhaps we as a fintech company should be com-
pelled to state here that resource equals money, but
our research and development on the matter shows
that within the protocol’s ecosystem when creating
various types of Smart Assets there will sometimes
be Smart Deals with a different resource.

That is why we give the following definition of a
Supplier End Client — it’s an end client in posses-
sion of financial or other resources wishing to use his
resource in a chosen Smart Asset to create a Smart
Deal with a tokenized cash flow or other goods.

The BANKEX protocol accounts for the possibil-
ity that the Supplier may also have various roles, as
shown on the schematic on Figure 9.

Supplier Agent — an organization (e.g. bank),
representing a portfolio of end clients who wish to
take part in a Smart Asset using their resources.

There is a significant difference here from the sim-
ilar structure of an originator, because in the situa-
tion where a Supplier End Client enters the ecosystem
without a Supplier Agent, he has no way of access-
ing a Smart Asset deal directly, instead BANKEX
serves the role of a Supplier Agent in this case. Fre-
quently the Supplier will be represented by financial
resources, and in order to allow them to enter the
Smart Asset Exchange, they will require, at the very
least, a KYC procedure of the Supplier End Client
based on the requirements of the country where the
particular Product Instance functions. That is our
current method for our active fintech products.

For some Smart Assets the BANKEX team devel-
ops special procedures of Accreditation. This has
to do with the complicated matter of acceptable risk
levels for a resource and not all end clients are able
to evaluate it accordingly. One of our advisors re-
garded the development of the Supplier Accreditation
procedure as a potential limit to the technology’s po-

tential.We are aware that in order to create a global
technology, the participants of said technology must
not be limited, so the Supplier Accreditation proce-
dure is not a limit. Is it merely one of the smart con-
tracts within the chain of Supplier tokenization and,
in the event where a resource is unable to pass Sup-
plier Accreditation, this merely means the Product
Owner of this particular Smart Asset needs to deter-
mine the ensuing path of the resource tokenized with
the new parameters received. This includes determin-
ing special legal conditions for it where necessary, if
it is required by the country where the Product In-
stance of the particular Smart Asset functions. This
allows to bypass limitations of usage for the Proof-of-
Asset Protocol on a low technological level stemming
from the particularities of local legislation — they are
simply included into the tokenization formulas of the
corresponding Product Instance.

It is also important to note that, as with the Origi-
nator, work through a Supplier Agent is a very simple
mean of investing their resource into previously inac-
cessible types of assets for smaller end clients. End
client resources are easily merged into portfolios dur-
ing tokenization, granting them access to profitable
and secure asset types. Never in history have such
types of assets been accessible to a simple end client
with a moderate amount of resources. Blockchain-
based tokenization gives these opportunities to prac-
tically any person regardless of accumulated riches
or social status. It is a true evolution of liquidity of
assets and their accessibility.

So, the characteristics of the Supplier in the pro-
tocol are as follows:

• role: Smart Asset consumer;

• function: taking part in the Smart Asset and
creation of Smart Deal using his resource.

5 Initial Smart Asset Offering
(ISAO)

5.1 BANKEX Foundation

BANKEX Foundation is a non-commercial self-
regulated organization with a community the mem-
bers of which are engaged in work and development
of smart contracts for new Smart Assets and Product
Instances created with its participation. It includes
blockchain technology experts, programmers as well
as product providers and product experts.

The BANKEX Foundation as a non-profit orga-
nization is an important element of the BANKEX
Protocol ecosystem, which allows coordination of the
actions of various other elements of the system.

19



Supplier

Supplier End Client
(investor, people,

infrastructure element)

Supplier Agent
(bank, fund, investor,
infrastructure owner)

Smart Asset Type
(choose product, KYC
accreditation token)

Figure 9: Asset Supplier

We must note here that while other sections of
The Smart White Paper BANKEX describe processes
and technologies in various states of readiness but ex-
isting in the real world, this section is going to present
the model of a concept not yet existing in the world,
but aimed at solving issues.

When creating prototypes of various Smart Assets
at the BANKEX Lab we have encountered a situation
where many business owners from various countries
started coming to us, wishing to tokenize their assets
via the ICO procedure. Our vision of tokenization,
which we have already discussed in this White Pa-
per earlier, concludes that issuing your own coin is a
poor solution for assets belonging to the real sector
of economy where rocket science technologies don’t
exist. Nonetheless, the necessity and even inevitabil-
ity of the tokenization of their assets in the future
are obvious. We suggested the procedure of Smart
Asset emission to these clients, some of the resulting
Originators were accepted by the BANKEX Lab as
pilot designs. These assets will be prepared for the
Initial Smart Asset Offering (ISAO) in the Proof-of-
Asset Protocol ecosystem. But we turned down the
majority of them.

How do we see the possibility of providing these
businesses with the option to tokenize, regardless of
the centralized initiator-company of the Smart Asset?

The BANKEX team assumes the Market will
form more and more such requests as time passes.
These requests will come from owners of businesses
or assets, meaning Originators with No token Asset.
The BANKEX Lab is receiving such requests now,
but subsequently they will be addressed to multiple
Product Owners in the ecosystem. Those requests
that the Product Owners can tokenize they will pro-
cess, creating Product Instances. Of course, they will
also turn down many incoming requests. The reason
is not so important at this point.

Such requests for tokenization of a new type of
assets are directed by acting Product Owners to the
BANKEX Foundation (Figure 10).

Now let’s examine the schematic to see how the
BANKEX Foundation coordinates actions:

Asset Community — as the request for creation
of a Smart Asset came from the Market, there

is clearly an individual or group of individuals
who are pioneers and enthusiasts of this prod-
uct. These are the people the BANKEX Foun-
dation forms a product community from for the
creation of a new type of Smart Asset. This
product community then takes over the busi-
ness development of the aforementioned Smart
Asset. The initiator of the request for such a
Smart Asset Type may become the founder of
said Asset Community. Such communities are
also needed by the ecosystem for two more im-
portant functions - product expertise and pro-
viding Proof-of-Asset evidence in the event of
Smart Deal disputes. It’s important that in the
Asset Community we do not require identifica-
tion of all the members — they take part in the
ecosystem only with their knowledge and expe-
rience.

Foundation Community — this is a community
of programmers and business developers, who
are fans of the decentralized Blockchain Service
Architecture. They are the people responsible
for creating the world-changing chains of Smart
Contracts for various No token Assets.

New Smart Asset Type — is a program code fully
ready for initiation. As we see on the schematic
the Asset Community, Foundation Community
and the BANKEX Lab with participation from
third party experts takes part in the creation
of this code. The quality of the code is guar-
anteed by the BANKEX Smart Asset Certifica-
tion Center.

So the BANKEX Foundation in the protocol has
the following characteristics:

• role: community built around the protocol;

• function: creation of new types of Smart Assets
and the development of the protocol that will
be in-demand by the community, as well as the
growth of the community that is going to use
the protocol.

20



Figure 10: ISAO Structure

5.2 BANKEX Crypto-FIAT Deposi-
tory

One of the existing and not yet solved issues in asset
tokenization is the impossibility for legally significant
organizations to purchase tokens. There is a long se-
ries of details relevant for different locations.

Let us pause on the most important and define
their common features.

First, banks and organizations are able to invest
into companies, using stocks and equities. In banks,
classical funds and large financial groups there are
special departments that invest into corporate secu-
rities and other financial instruments on stock ex-
changes. These departments are able to invest into
securities, but lack the ability to invest into crypto-
graphic coins and tokens, as they have no common
tools for that.

Second, banks and organizations must place pur-
chased assets on their balance upon investment, for
that they require legally relevant documents that con-
firm purchase of the asset. Token purchase provides
no such documents.

Third, banks and organizations lack the technol-
ogy to follow their existing security regulations when
storing cryptoassets. As we all know, should the pri-
vate key be compromised, that would be enough to
lose access to the crypto wallet, and it doesn’t matter
what amount is stored on the wallet, if a malignant
party obtains the private key it can vanish in an in-

stance. Banks are unable, or rather they cannot per-
mit assets to be stored with such security parameters.

In the BANKEX ecosystem solution of these prob-
lems is handled by the BANKEX Crypto-FIAT
Depository. This is a legal organization and a tech-
nology for cryptoasset storage. The Crypto-FIAT
Depository works as any classical depository with the
only difference being that it grants its classical clients
the ability to store cryptoassets.

We see this as the Depository forming a legal
agreement with a bank or organization to give the
Depository permission to store clients’ cryptoassets.
After that the client registers a wallet in the Deposi-
tory for the cryptoassets he requires. If it’s an ERC20
token then an Ethereum Wallet is registered. After
that the client does not receive the private key to the
wallet - instead it’s instantly conserved in the deposi-
tory’s storage until the client closes the account. The
client receives a regular depository receipt in return
for his cryptoasset.

The technology to store coins and tokens in the
Crypto-FIAT Depository allows a client to conduct
operations with cryptoassets on his balance, and
what’s more important, it lets him do this in a way
that he’s used to. He sees these cryptocurrencies in
the same way he would see classical assets. This is
the very technology that FIAT and Crypto markets
are waiting for.

21



5.3 BANKEX Crypto Fund

5.4 Initial Smart Asset Offering
(ISAO)

Initial Smart Asset Offering (ISAO) — is the initial
Smart Asset offer with the goal of tokenizing finan-
cial assets or real economy sector assets in the form
of emission and sale of Smart Asset Tokens to buyers.

An ISAO can only be carried out with an as-
set present, in other words either a functioning or
planned cash flow. A technological startup or RnD
cannot be tokenized via the ISAO procedure.

On the schematic (Figure 10) we can see the re-
quest for an ISAO comes from an Originator, i.e.
owner of a financial or manufacturing asset. This
Originator does not need to create the tokenization
technology – instead the best programmers from var-
ious teams coordinated by the BANKEX Foundation
compete for its creation.

It would be fair to state that a first-time Origi-
nator with the desire to create a new type of Smart
Asset and an Originator initiating an Initial Smart
Asset Offering can be one and the same person, which
is what we are striving for. But at the same time this
schematic does not permit centralization of the pro-
gram solution, as the Originator neither influences
the actual writing of the Smart Asset code, nor con-
trols the programmers, the Originator is only able to
take part in the development via product expertise
using the Asset Community mechanism.

In the BANKEX Proof-of-Asset Protocol ecosys-
tem the following can take part in the initial purchase
of Smart Asset Tokens on a technological level:

• buyers originating from the market;

• banks and classical funds via the BANKEX CF
Depository and “Co-Fund” systems;

• members of the product community interested
in development of assets of this particular type.

If the buyer originates from the market or the As-
set Community and he needs to make a purchase us-
ing FIAT currencies, he has the ability to do that via
the Crypto-FIAT Depository. If the buyer wants to
make a purchase using ETH — he can do so directly.

The buyer of Smart Asset Tokens — in terms
of entities present in the Proof-of-Asset Protocol, as
outlined in the previous chapter — takes the role of
the Supplier.

5.5 Open Source: Smart Asset Core

BANKEX Foundation presents a platform for col-
laborative work with an open source code, created
to promote technologies in the banking and financial
sectors.

An Open Source approach to development based
on collaborative use of software can ensure trans-
parency, stability and support needed to implement
blockchain technologies. The main task of organiza-
tions is the development of a global cooperation and
support of leaders and entrepreneurs in the field of
finances, banking, Internet of Things and decentral-
ized technologies.

We welcome all who take part in the developer
community of the Smart Asset Protocol regardless of
membership status. Additional information on the
technical details and methods of collaboration can be
found on the community page https://github.com/
BankEx.

Open Source Protocol — Smart Asset Core
(https://github.com/BankEx/smart-asset-core)
is the base structure to tokenize and securitize assets.
It contains all the necessary modules for integration
of third party information providers and tools for
writing specialized smart contracts.

Open Source Proposal:

• development of the blockchain community in
order to support the Proof-of-Asset Protocol;

• establishing partner connections and their sub-
sequent technical support;

• formulation of the direction of technological
development and establishing interaction with
Product Providers;

• creation of the protocol’s core architecture with
subsequent increase of functionality by involv-
ing specialists from the open source community;

• ensuring protocol security, including by means
of involving third party white hat hackers &
developers;

• organization of a tight cooperation with solu-
tions of other open source communities, such
as the Consensus Foundation, Ethereum Foun-
dation, Symphony Foundation, Hyperledger

Open Source Finance part:

• tech support for partners;

• bounty program for developers (expenses) —
guarantee of security.

22



6 BANKEX Proof-of-Asset
Protocol

6.1 Registration data & product data

The our first step in researching the liquidity protocol
is data. BANKEX as a classical fintech company is
well aware how many different existing banking sys-
tems there are, many with an architecture that was
established many years ago.

That’s why in order to build the protocol technol-
ogy we have begun our research from scratch, rather
than basing it off of any existing IT infrasctructure
of a bank. This may be an unexpected decision to
some IT specialists of the banking segment, but we
have decided to separate all the information we work
with during initialization of Smart Assets into just
two parts: registration data and product data. We
see no reason to overcomplicate this.

Registration data — data that allows the identifi-
cation of a client. Modern registration data contains
an intrinsic fundamental controversy. On the one
hand, internet platforms have evolved to the high-
est level of simplification for this data - most of them
request nothing but a client’s e-mail upon initial reg-
istration. On the other hand, in order to work with
financial information in global economy, it is neces-
sary to receive the most extensive registration data
from the client - this is a matter of public security.

In the blockchain network technology there is,
in essence, only one vitally important identification,
which is the address of one’s wallet. As we are build-
ing the financial asset tokenization protocol, we find
this information insufficient. Here is our solution.
The registration data that allows client identifica-
tion is taken beyond the tokenization cycle. When a
Smart Asset is created on the Ethereum blockchain,
we retain the technological capability to perform to-
kenization using only the Ethereum Wallet number,
but at the same time we also create a connection be-
tween the Ethereum Wallet used in tokenization and
the other registration data using the BANKEX KYC
Adapter. This is imperative as different banks may
have completely different assortments of client regis-
tration data and, what’s more important, these are
personal details that are protected in many countries.
It would be unwise to create a Smart Asset reliant on
them.

On a technological level the Proof-of-Asset Pro-
tocol allows the BANKEX KYC Adapter to be in-
tegrated with any KYC provider functioning in the
country. BANKEX has a subsidiary with a work-
ing product of this type. This is not rocket science.
All we can say is we are followers of the technology
of client identification via blockchain-stored hash, re-

ceived from client data initially verified by a reliable
source.

The most important consequence of the decision
to take registration data beyond the tokenization cy-
cle using the BANKEX KYC Adapter, is that various
Originators, including banks, can now be integrated
more comprehensively and with minimal effort. The
Originator defines identification parameters and the
Proof-of-Asset Protocol adjusts to suit those param-
eters, creating a link between client data and the
Smart Asset blockchain wallet.

What about the data that goes into the Smart As-
set? That’s product data - an arrangement of data
necessary to tokenize the client’s asset, with parame-
ters and contents defined exclusively by the Product
Owner separately for every Smart Asset Type.

On the schematic you can see, along with the pro-
tocol entities you have already become familiarized
with, that the Product segment includes blocks that
define product data for both the Originator and the
Supplier.

The quantity and types of product data fields are
not limited in any way — it is decided entirely by
the Smart Contract logic necessary for a particular
Product Instance.

As a brief summary, the ecosystem of the protocol
generally allows for various other registration data —
the principle of work with them is always going to
remain unchanged, they are technically impossible to
store in a Smart Asset. In any event where any entity
needs to be identified, the process of identification it-
self is always going to be beyond the logical cycle
of the Smart Contracts included in the Smart Asset.
The protocol only interacts with such data on the
level of confirmed or unconfirmed registration data
hashes that come from external oracles.

The only possible exception to this rule is when
the Smart Asset Proof-of-Asset Protocol is fully real-
ized on the Microsoft Azure Bank API server within
the bank’s security network.

6.2 Creating a Smart Asset

As we have already discussed the Blockchain Ser-
vice Architecture allows formation of various chains
of smart contracts based on the protocol. Let’s ex-
amine the order in which a typical Smart Asset is
created.

We see five desired logical steps in the Proof-of-
Asset Protocol to be able to call a token a Smart
Asset (Figure 11). These steps are:

• initial contract;

• validation;

23



• audit;

• legal;

• proposal.

We first initialize the contract, selecting a type
of Smart Asset. The Smart Asset’s type determines
product data required for the token and the logic by
which that data is processed. Next the Originator
fills in General Information, which can happen both
manually and automatically. Data entered by the
Originator is what we presently call digitalization.
The information is there, but its value is unknown as
the filled in forms have no function and, more impor-
tantly, have no validity - we have no way of knowing
if that information is genuine. The next step is Vali-
dation. This is where Smart Contracts are executed
that validate the information entered by the client
using various trusted sources. These can include In-
ternet of Things Sensors, Eternal Oracle, Crawlers
and others. It is crucial that the contract is satu-
rated with data from sources independent from the
Originator, which allows for an accurate assessment
of the authenticity of General Information provided.

Next the result is audited, always by an outside
party. This is the part of tokenization where a 3rd
party gets involved. Primarily this is BANKEX,
comparing hash totals of the current Smart Asset
code with certification data from the BANKEX Foun-
dation. Only a verified SACC code can get the
BANKEX Verifed mark. These can also be account-
ing services or any other services that can check the
process of tokenization based on Smart Asset logic.

It is also important that at this point classical
offchain organizations can also get involved, if that
is supported by the issuing conditions of the Smart
Asset.

Legal is the step where every Product Instance
can set up legal conditions specifically required for
both it and the country where it’s located. This is
also where the Smart Assets intended for global liq-
uidity establish the norms of governmental and cus-
toms regulations. The Blockchain Service Architec-
ture allows any existing legal regulations to be writ-
ten into Smart logic. If the government of your coun-
try demands that you must receive an official doc-
ument from the town hall for your asset, then you
do just that. You head to the town hall, receive the
official document, scan it and add it into the Smart
Asset with your signature or that of a certifying of-
ficer. After the government implements tokeniza-
tion to their algorithms you can simply change the
one corresponding Smart Contract included in your
Smart Asset.

Proposal — Smart Contracts that fix the base
price of a Smart Asset and define the type of opera-
tion that will be performed with the taken asset on
the Smart Asset Exchange. From a stock exchange
perspective, the result of this step is the creation of
a bid. From a blockchain perspective — the issuing
of a token.

6.3 Smart Asset Сaterpillar

The BANKEX team named this tokenization princi-
ple the Smart Asset Caterpillar, although it was not
our first choice of name. It was picked up when we
realized that in order to achieve true value of a Smart
Asset, which means proving that it is ensured by an
actual asset, it was imperative that smart contracts
in the chain were to flow from one to another in an
uninterrupted sequence. If you were to cut an earth-
worm in half, its parts will survive for a time. But
if a caterpillar is cut in half or even if it loses any
segment of its body — it dies. This principle is true
for the Smart Contract chain in a Smart Asset. If
you interrupt the chain or either of the links becomes
invalid then the Smart Asset formula will result in
a value of zero for the asset. Any link of the Smart
Asset Сaterpillar being insufficiently validated would
have a detrimental effect on the resulting value of the
entire Smart Asset.

A second important consequence of the Smart As-
set Caterpillar tokenization principle is that every sig-
nificant step on the chain that affects the Smart As-
set’s value is recorded on the blockchain. You enter
your General Information during step one and press
next - the Blockchain Service Architecture asks if you
wish to record your commitment on the blockchain
(Figure 12), after which you will receive details of
the transaction on blockchain (Figure 13).

This is not just digitization — it is tokenization,
an imprint of your commitment and, the further along
the Smart Asset Caterpillar you are, the more valid
your commitment is to other members of the ecosys-
tem.

It’s worth noting here that the BANKEX Proof-
of-Asset Protocol technology supports several techni-
cal solutions for the recording of the aforementioned
imprints on the blockchain, including industry-
specific know-how.

6.4 Initial contract

The exact way in which every contract is initialized is
defined by the Product Owner when calculating the
Product Instance (Figure 14). Let us note several
significant steps for the majority of Smart Assets.

First, initialization will require the registration

24



Figure 11: Proof-of-Asset Protocol

Figure 12: Step 1 — Asset Initialization

Figure 13: Step 2 — Asset Validation

25



Figure 14: Initial Contract

Figure 15: Example of Asset Initialization

26



data of the Originator End Client, and as we operate
in the technological stack of the blockchain network,
we have agreed not to store registration data — we
must receive a Wallet address. For the demo ver-
sion of our product we used a web interface with the
Metamask Ethereum Wallet plugin (Figure 15):

With this iteration the Ethereum wallet address
is automatically taken from the plugin. In other iter-
ations or on other blockchains this may work differ-
ently.

Why do we need a wallet address? By using it
we receive the ability to perform client identification
through the BANKEX KYC Adapter or any other
KYC provider. Additionally, the demo shows it’s pos-
sible to request an optional field as well, such as an
e-mail.

Second, when initializing the contract data is en-
tered into General Information fields. General in-
formation is entered either manually by the client or
automatically, but its accuracy is decided only by the
person inputting it. It would be fair to state that to-
kenization does not rely on accuracy of the General
Information entered. We take it as it is, whereas the
authenticity required for the Smart Asset is going to
be determined by the logic of subsequent contracts
in the chain. It’s interesting that not all true infor-
mation may actually be required by the Smart Asset,
and an Originator End client who doesn’t know how
to determine a code’s Solidity may not even know
how important the fields he is filling in are. When
the BANKEX team hears talk about the need for
each and every person in the future to have program-
ming skills, we immediately recall our Smart Asset
Caterpillar.

Third, in the General Information block of the
demo we show that information fields may be of any
type, depending on the habits of a programmer. A
type-bar, a file, a catalogue, digits — any type of field
at all.

Fourth, part of the General Information block’s
function may be carried outside the blockchain logic
and outside the logic of external oracles, instead be-
ing based on the UI alone. Our RnD showed that
the simplest but sometimes necessary function of the
logic, such as checking hash totals in specific fields
can easily be diverted to web-based or any other pro-
gramming logic used in a particular Product Instance.

The results of the Initial contract steps are:

• creation of a Smart Asset entity;

• assigning the Smart Asset with a unique ID for
subsequent connection IoT and Oracle;

• may involve the creation of a legal Soft Com-
mitment;

• a data record on the blockchain.

6.5 Validation

The Validation step (Figure 16) of a Smart Asset is
the most fascinating for Research and Development,
this is where various means and methods for the val-
idation of the General Information can be built.

Let us define the following terms.
Internet of Things (IoT ) will be the main con-

dition for the validation of Smart Contracts, and this
will come much sooner than we can imagine. Very
soon our world will become filled with myriads of vari-
ous sensors and transmitters for smart contracts, just
as it has already become filled with smartphones and
surveillance cameras.

IoT Sensors can come in any number of different
combinations. BANKEX is not an IoT company, and
yet our lab already has more than 50 different sensors
with different purposes. In the demo application we
used three of them - an accelerometer, a location pin
and a photo camera that any smartphone is equipped
with. Let us remind you here that cell phones are al-
ready used as tools for payment.

Many companies today are trying to create Smart
sensors, outfitted with an internal logic, but the de-
cisive potential is definitely held in a combination of
IoT Sensors and the logic of Smart Assets.

The second element are External Oracles,
which are the obvious choice for data validation to-
day, and which are used by many companies world-
wide. You can check a person’s information using his
Pass ID or request information on an organization
using its Registration Number. You can request in-
formation on rates and constants being developed by
public organizations or institutes. Or you can simply
perform crawling of information from a chosen web-
site. Everything you need for your Product Instance.
Using External Oracles it’s possible to implement
almost any logic you could need on the Ethereum
blockchain even today, it’s not complicated.

Use of the oracle technology to examine images
or videos captured by IoT sensors deserves additional
mention. Soon enough you will not have to pay for
the recognition of your car license plate. The Smart
Contract would be able to send a fine from your bank
account on its own.

Smart Asset creation logic may include any num-
ber of External Oracles and each calculation will have
its price, but even today there are technical solutions
which allow them to be cheapened on the Ethereum
blockchain. It would be safe to assume that in the
future there will likely be even more such solutions
available.

Internal checks are simplest logical flags or hash

27



Figure 16: Validation Step

totals that nonetheless may greatly impact the price
of a Smart Asset, for instance a flag showing whether
or not there is a supporting document uploaded along
with the request to the Microsoft Azure cloud.

The results of the Validation step are:

• additional information input into the Smart As-
set entity;

• formula determining the importance of con-
cluded validation;

• operation saved on blockchain.

6.6 Audit & Legal
In terms of technical implementation, interaction
with third party audit organizations, jurisprudence
or government is also dedicated to an External Ora-
cle.

We initially called this section Global Delivery
Conditions because in order to make an asset as liq-
uid as possible, it must achieve global liquidity. It
is similar to Amazon.com in the field of digitized
goods. Global liquidity of various assets is our fu-
ture, now the most important task is the embedding
of the Smart Asset ecosystem into existing national
legislation and state regulations.

We are often told that the implementation of
Smart Assets is extremely complicated due to the im-
possibility of giving them legal significance. It’s true
that it’s a complicated task, but offchain legal condi-
tions are not at all difficult to write into the chain of
Smart Asset contracts, even if one of the Smart Con-
tracts requires action to be taken offchain or even
offline. Does something need to be done and then
marked with a tick? Good - we include this condi-
tion into the logic of the Smart Asset’s function and

mark it with the tick, then the Smart Asset becomes
valid and, consequently, gains value.

Obviously, the implementation of Smart Con-
tracts is only a matter of time for any efficient nation,
since the volume of inefficiencies in any large organi-
zation, including nations, is enormous. It is both ben-
eficial and sensible. Once a nation’s work conditions
are modernized, you need only update your contract
chain to the latest Product Instance. In fact, if you
are the Originator, you won’t even have to do that —
it will be done by the BANKEX Foundation.

Cost of delivery estimation and automatic cus-
toms tax of the exported asset based on data from
the location sensor could also occur during this block.
Which, we may add, opens the way for export/import
of cash flow associated with various types of assets
between nations.

6.7 Proposal

Logically and technically this is the most difficult step
of the Smart Asset Сaterpillar. It’s where the magic
happens:

• trading rules are set for the chosen type of
Smart Asset;

• asset authenticity rate is calculated;

• the asset’s base price is calculated;

• the asset’s intended use is specified;

• Hard Commitment parameters are set;

• cash flow distribution is defined according to
Smart Deal.

28



Actually everything is much simpler, with com-
plicated deals that we make in the offchain world be-
coming significantly easier once they are given an al-
gorithm with the Smart Asset logic. You can find this
out yourself by simply breaking down any deal that
interests you to its basic elements. Now do the same
thing again while also removing human error and you
get a Smart Deal (Figure 17).

The result of this step is the issuing of a token and
formation of a bid for the Smart Asset Exchange.

7 Technical solutions

7.1 IT Architecture Scheme

IT architecture scheme is presented on Figure 18.

7.2 Asset data compression for
blockchain record

7.3 Role and system access matrix

7.4 Originator/Supplier interaction in
the ecosystem architecture

7.5 Bank & non-Bank Origina-
tor/Supplier

7.6 Use of Microsoft Azure Bank API

7.7 Large data volume hashing in the
Microsoft Azure Storage

7.8 Soft and Hard Commitment as-
signment rules

7.9 Bid & Ask records independence
principle

7.10 Decentralized Order Book rules

7.11 Decentralized matching — pros
and cons

7.12 Offchain Settelment Control

7.13 Settelment directions

7.14 Formula 1: saturation of request
with data in a blockchain envi-
ronment

7.15 Reasons for differentiation be-
tween order and bid for Smart
Assets

7.16 Formula 2: solution for auto-
mated order merging and sepa-
ration

7.17 Formula 3: filter cascade system
in the Order Book

7.18 Formula 4: implementation of
classical stock market trade rules
in a blockchain environment

7.19 Study of speed parameters of
matching for Smart Assets

7.20 Technological differences during
Supplier tokenization

29



Figure 17: SmartDeal Proposal Step

Figure 18: IT Architecture Scheme

30



7.21 Transaction execution with de-
centralized storage

7.22 Work with order packages during
contract initiation

7.23 Order of Escrow function in the
transaction execution block

7.24 Smart Asset Core v.3

Version 3 of Smart Asset Core is presented on Fig-
ure 19.

7.25 Smart Asset Core v.4

7.26 “Plasma” protocol & Proof-of-
Asset Protocol

A “Plasma” protocol was proposed recently, that
is universal extension of any Turing-complete
blockchain (such as Ethereum) and allows creation of
“daughter” blockchains that are governed by higher-
level (“parent”) blockchain. These “daughter” chains
can have different consensus rules, functionality (ex-
tensions to EMV, for example) and underlying base
token.

Such extension naturally fits Proof-of-Asset pro-
posal with Bankex token (BKX) being an underlying
currency used to pay for manipulations with asset
records. If functional requirements for some types
of assets or operations would impose a need of ex-
tended functionality, such type of assets can be moved
to separate chain. These “daughter” chains can be
viewed as side-chains for ease of understanding prop-
erties, but strongly governed and penalized by “par-
ent” chain for any sign of misbehavior of fraud. Such
approach and further extension of “daughter” - “par-
ent” relation to the whole tree of chains would al-
low participants of Bankex protocol to effectively do
transactions with minimal trust and be able to be
minimally exposed to potential fraudulent actions of
other participants, especially ones not even related to
their current transaction, in contrast to traditional
single level chain, where potential attack affects all
users immediately (DAO hack, for example).

7.27 The most important features of
Plasma protocol

One of the most important features of Plasma pro-
tocol is an ability to extend EMV and add required
functionality, that is now only possible by use of ex-
ternal oracles. One of such examples would be a
development of JWT (JSON Web token) like mes-
sage exchange format with mandatory cryptographic
signatures, that would allow some form of replaya-
bility and authentication of requests to external re-
sources. Such exchange format and use case can be
illustrated as following: Over the lifetime of smart
asset some data from external service (External API
request) Traditionally it’s solved by use of external
oracle (such as oraclize.it), that performs a request
on your behalf, provides some proof of authenticity
(TLS Notary) and performs a callback. Such oper-
ation is expensive and requires few roundtrips. TLS
Notary is not possible in modern versions of TLS pro-
tocol.

Our proposed approach would be to build a stan-
dard requests protocol that would start with pre-
signed (by smart-contract itself or other way) pay-
load, that can be used to perform a request to exter-
nal resource at some timeframe and requiring a re-
sponse to be signed by private key of external resource
(with public key also known upfront). Also, standard
would require that ANY request with such payload
would return THE SAME response, so it would allow
to perform distributed computing and easy verifica-
tion for including information into the blockchain.

Another interesting extension would be possibil-
ity to perform “delayed calls” — requests to a smart
asset functions that should be performed either at
known date or regularly. For now such action would
also require an external oracle, while such informa-
tion can potentially be saved inside a blockchain, so
every participant could trigger a function execution
for an incentive in a form of fee (similar to the gas
price).

At some point an extension of EMV can be re-
quired to facilitate new requirements or have back-
ward compatibility with older systems. Such func-
tionality can be RSA functions (for old systems),
Schnorr signatures (can be extended already as con-
venience method) or post-quantum cryptography.
We see a need in having a degree of backward com-
patibility to connect existing systems to blockchain.

But the most tedious questions to be solved for
wider applications of blockchain, where computations
are transparent, are, in our opinion, random num-
ber generation and homomorphic cryptography. First
one is the cornerstone of cryptography in general and
a way of obtaining a random number of appropri-

31



Figure 19: Smart-Asset Core, Version 3

32



ate quality will be a major breakthrough in a field.
The latter is, for now, the only known possible way
to achieve privacy and computation transparency at
the same time. We think that extensive development
and experimenting in this field should start as soon as
possible, with choice of currently known candidates
and implementing them in a “subchain” to which data
can be transferred, manipulated and returned to the
parent chain without disclosure of nature of underly-
ing data.

7.28 IoT Integration Scheme
One of the necessary steps for IoT-enhanced assets is
the procedure of integrating them with the IoT device
control infrastructure. The procedure is shown on the
Figure 20. There are four major layers of back-end
applications involved:

The backend consists of four primary server ap-
plications:

1. web3j-compatible connector to the Ethereum
network node;

2. TLS-secured web server for serving HTTPS-
requests for both API and frontend;

3. secured WebSocket server (wss://);

4. DeviceHive8 server for IoT device management.

Let us describe the full process of integration in
the case of a web-application (with a MetaMask ex-
tension installed) and the Android IoT App

1. The asset owner selects one of the types pro-
vided.

2. Initial data on the asset is filled in by its owner.
After all the information is filled in, the user ini-
tiates the procedure of publishing the asset on
a blockchain by using the contract function via
MetaMask. On this stage we learn the newly
created asset’s unique identification, which the
client receives following a successful transac-
tion.

3. After receiving the asset ID, the web interface
moves on to the next step. The first thing that
is required is a backend connection between the
ongoing web-session and the ID of the newly

created asset, which is done using a WebSocket
connection. Until this step only the client and
the blockchain are aware of the asset, and un-
less it is taken backend won’t be able to send
events from the server, if they are linked to the
current asset. A WebSocket connection solves
this problem.

4. To connect the asset to IoT devices, the web
page displays a specially generated QR-code,
containing a link to the asset ID http://iot.
bankex.com/ASSET_ID.

5. The user scans this code using the BANKEX
IoT App. If it’s not installed, the code can al-
ternatively be scanned by any QR-code scanner
application, which is going to open the link in
a browser, automatically redirecting the user to
App Store or Play Market to download the ap-
plication. Deep-linking support allows the ap-
plication to be launched with additional param-
eters, including the asset ID, immediately after
installation, which helps prevent scanning the
same QR-code twice.

6. BANKEX IoT App is now ready to connect the
asset ID to the ID of the device, which the appli-
cation already knows at this point. In a simpler
case, the BANKEX IoT App already supports
the phone’s sensor identification, which requires
no additional tools to demonstrate capabilities.
External sensors can also be added using this
application.

7. The device contacts API, sending two key pa-
rameters: asset ID and device ID. This informa-
tion is also shared with the DeviceHive, where
the new data is automatically registered, as well
as WebSocket to inform of the client’s newly
added device.

8. At this stage, the device ID is not yet added
to the smart asset, although it is visible in the
web client in the list of devices available to be
added. To finish the integration, the user must
confirm the device using the function in Meta-
Mask. This transaction can charge additional
Ether or BKX-tokens to credit the oracle’s IoT
event execution expenses.

8 https://devicehive.com/

33



Figure 20: IoT–Asset Integration: the User Story

34



A Terminology
Blockchain — a cryptographically secured database containing the history of all transactions performed on

the platform. It works the following way:

1. Transaction info is sent into the blockchain network

2. This transaction together with other transactions forms a block. Every block has its number and
holds encrypted information about preceding blocks.

3. The block is sent in to be checked by all members of the network

4. If there are no discrepancies, every member adds the new block to the chain of previous blocks and
the transaction is executed.

Node — a blockchain network participant storing information on past transactions (blockchain), checks infor-
mation on new transactions for authenticity and is able to add in new transactions (adding blocks). All
the nodes are connected to one another forming a single network.

A public blockchain is a decentralized system where the information on transactions is stored and checked
in many multiple locations. This kind of synchronization between millions of locations consumes large
amounts of electric energy and is significantly more expensive than a private blockchain. The system also
becomes slower. However, a public blockchain may prove preferable for industries where decentralization
is necessary.

A private blockchain is centralized, making it similar to traditional centralized systems, however it exceeds
them in terms of efficiency and security.

ICO (Initial Coin Offering) — a method of invitation to finance a campaign/project. Tokens/coins are
issued that grant the right to receive a share/service/good now or in the future, or else they grant a
percentage of future profits. After the start of sales, tokens can be resold to other investors. Trade is
conducted on a blockchain.

Cryptocurrency — digital money without a physical analogue. It is supported by the complexity of its
development — mining. Today we are able to identify “classics” such as Bitcoin or Litecoin, and newer
currencies such as Ether, which act as platforms for the creation of new assets - tokens.

Ethereum — the most popular platform for issuing of tokens and smart contracts.

Gas — a unit used to measure the price of calculations done on Ethereum. More difficult calculations are
rewarded with higher amounts of Gas. This works the following way: the originator of a smart contract
sets a price in gas. Miners, whose PCs handle the calculations, make the choice whether or not to perform
these calculations. If the price offered is too low, then neither the calculations, nor, as a result, the contract
will ever be concluded.

Smart-contract a set of pre-programmed tasks that the program automatically carries out upon certain con-
ditions being fulfilled, then forms a deal. That’s why it requires no trust between sides, nor a middleman:
the contract has a strict logical structure and the computer executes it automatically. Smart-contracts
allow for inclusion of a large number of conditions and states and for a correlation between their every
possible combination and various outcomes.

Ditigal tokens — croptygraphic assets issued using specialized blockchain platforms. An analogue would be
a record in a register. A token has an address and may also contain a smart-contract that defines its
function and also acts as a separate execution mechanism.

Tokenization — the process of transforming rights into a digital token, which is then traded on a blockchain
with low transactional costs. Tokenization is an analogue of securitization on a blockchain.

Smart Asset — an asset that has gone through tokenization using the BANKEX Proof-of-Asset Protocol.

ISAO (Initial Smart Asset Offering) — a method of fixing businesses (farms, stores, manufacturing plants)
using tokenization of their assets based on the BANKEX PoA protocol.

35



Product instance — an iteration of a fintech-product owned by a BANKEX product provider. For instance a
product provider can customize his product for various regions, thus creating a product instance for each
country.

Blockchain-agnostic protocol — an application level protocol that does not depend on the exact blockchain-
technology utilized and can be implemented on any existing open source blockchain.

References
[1] Y. Amihud, H. Mendelson, and L. H. Pedersen. “Liquidity and Asset Prices. Foundations and trends in

Finance”. In: Wordsworth Editions Limited 4.1 (2005), pp. 269–364.

[2] A. Ilmanen and C. Asness. Expected Returns: An Investor’s Guide to Harvesting Market Rewards. The
Wiley Finance Series. Wiley, 2011. isbn: 9781119990772. url: https://books.google.ru/books?id=
WqFf6imwTsUC.

[3] John Maynard Keynes and Mark G. Spencer. The General Theory of Employment, Interest and Money;
The economic consequences of the peace. Wordsworth Editions Limited, 2017. Chap. 13.

[4] John Nash. “Equilibrium Points in N-Person Games”. In: Proceedings of the National Academy of Sciences
36.1 (1950), pp. 48–49.

[5] John Nash. “Non-Cooperative Games”. In: The Annals of Mathematics 54.2 (1951), pp. 286–295.

[6] Stanford Encyclopedia of Philosophy.Game Theory. 2017. url: https://plato.stanford.edu/entries/
game-theory/.

[7] Avi Sharon. “Patient Capital, Private Opportunity: The Benefits and Challenges of Illiquid Alternatives”.
In: Alternative Investment Analyst Review Fall (2015). url: https://www.caia.org/aiar/access/
article-930.

[8] Chris Skinner. Lego Bank is Here, but It’s not Built with Lego. 2017. url: https://financialit.net/
blog/bank/lego-bank-here-its-not-built-lego.

[9] Nick Szabo. “Formalizing and Securing Relationships on Public Networks”. In: First Monday 2.16 (1997).
url: http://firstmonday.org/ojs/index.php/fm/article/view/548.

[10] Nick Szabo. “Smart Contracts: Building Blocks for Digital Free Markets”. In: Extropy 16 (1996). url:
http://www.fon.hum.uva.nl/rob/Courses/InformationInSpeech/CDROM/Literature/LOTwinterschool2006/
szabo.best.vwh.net/smart_contracts_2.html.

[11] “Top 50 Financial IT Pathfinder Ranking”. In: Financial IT April-May Issue (2017), pp. 36, 49. url:
https://financialit.net/pdf/view/17419.

36


